en: Vanilla pods, Vanilla beans
es: Vainilla en rama
fr: Gousses de vanille
hr: Mahune vanilije
lt: Vanilės ankštys, vanilės pupelės
nl: Vanillestokjes

en: vanilla extract
ar: مستخلص فانيليا عي
bg: екстракт от ванилия
ca: extracte de vainilla
cs: Vanilkový výtažek, vanilkový extrakt
da: vaniljeekstrakt, vaniljeessens
de: Vanilleextrakt, Vanille Extrakt
el: απόσταγμα βανίλιας
es: extracto de vainilla, esencia de vainilla
et: vanilliekstrakt
fi: vaniljauute
fr: extrait de vanille
he: תמצית וניל
hr: ekstrakt vanilije
hu: vaníliakivonat, vanília kivonat, vanília-kivonat
it: estratto di vaniglia
ja: バニラエキス
jv: Vanilla èkstrak
ko: 바닐라 추출액
lt: Vanilės ekstraktas
lv: vaniļas ekstrakts
mk: Екстракт од ванила
ms: Ekstrak vanila
nl: vanille-extract
nn: vaniljeekstrakt
pl: Ekstrakt z wanillii
pt: extrato de baunilha
ro: extract de vanilie
ru: экстракт ванили
sk: výtažok z vanilky
sl: izvlecek vanilje
sr: ekstrakt vanile
sv: vaniljextrakt
uk: Екстракт ванілі, ванільний екстракт
zh: 香草精精

en: Vanilla alcoholic extract
fr: Extrait alcoolique de vanille

en: Aqueous vanilla extract
fr: Extrait aqueux de vanille

en: Mixtures of herbs and spices
es: Mezclas de hierbas aromáticas y especias
fi: Yrttimausteseokset
fr: Mélanges d'herbes et d'épices
hr: Mješavine bilja i začina
it: Misto di erbe e spezie, Erbe e spezie miste
lt: Žolelių ir prieskonių mišiniai
nl: Kruiden/specerijenmengsel, Mengeling van aromatische kruiden en specerijen
pl: Mieszanki ziół i przypraw

en: Five-spice powders, Five spice, Chinese five spice
ar: مسحوق الخمس بهارات
ca: Pols de cinc espècies
de: Fünf-Gewürze-Pulver
eo: Kvinspica pulvoroj
es: Polvo de cinco especias, Polvo de las cinco especias
et: Viievürtsisegu
fi: Viisi mauste jauhe, Viismauste
fr: Cinq épices, Cinq parfums
is: Fimm krydda blanda
it: Polvere cinque spezie
ja: 五香粉
jv: Bubuk limang rempah
ko: 오향분
ms: Pancarempah
nb: Femkrydderpulver, Femkrydder, Five spice pulver
nl: Vijfkruidenpoeder
pt: Cinco-perfumes-chineses
ru: Китайская приправа из 5 трав
sl: Prašek petih začimb
sv: Fem kryddpulver, Five spice pulver
th: ผงห้าเครื่องเทศ
tr: Beşli baharat
uk: П'ять спецій
vi: Ngũ vị hương
zh: 五香粉, 五香

en: Ras el hanout
xx: Ras el hanout
fr: Ras el hanout, Raz el hanout
nl: Ras el hanoet

en: Chicken seasoning
pl: Przyprawy do kurczaka, Przyprawa do kurczaka

en: Lemon peppers
da: Citronpeber
sv: Citronpepparn

en: Chili peppers, chilis, hot peppers, Chilli peppers, chillis, Chilli
bg: Люти чушки
da: Chilipeberfrugter
de: Chilischoten, Chilis
es: Chiles
fi: chilit
fr: Piments, Piment
hr: Čili papričice
hu: Chili paprika
it: Peperoncini, peperoncino
ja: 唐辛子, トウガラシ, とうがらし
lt: Čili pipirai
nl: Chili pepers
pl: Papryczki chili, papryczki chilli
sv: Chilipeppar

en: Ground chili, Ground chilli
fi: Jauhettu chili
nb: Kvernet chili
sv: Mald chili
zh: 磨碎辣椒

en: Chili powders, Chilli powders
hr: Čili u prahu
lt: Čili milteliai
nl: Chilipoeders, Chillipoeders
pl: Chili w proszku, Chilli w proszku

en: Chili flakes, Chilli flakes
da: Chiliflager
de: Chiliflocken
sv: Chiliflingor

en: Capsicum frutescens
xx: Capsicum frutescens, C. frutescens

en: Cayenne peppers, Cayenne pepper
da: Cayennepeberfrugter, Cayenne-peberfrugter
es: Cayena
fr: Piments de Cayenne, Piment de Cayenne, Capsicum baccatum, aji, piment enragé, Poivres de Cayenne, poivre de Cayenne
hr: Kajenske paprike
ja: カイエンペッパー
lt: Kajeno pipirai, Kajeno pipiras
nl: Cayennepepers
pl: Pieprz kajeński, Pieprz Cayenne, Papryka kajeńska, Papryka Cayenne
sv: Cayennepeppar

en: Cayenne powder
da: Cayennepeber
es: Cayena en polvo
hr: Kajenski prah
lt: Kajeno milteliai
nl: Cayennepeperpoeders
sv: Cayennepepparpulver

en: Whole cayenne
da: Hele cayennepeberfrugter
es: Cayena entera
fr: Piments de Cayenne entiers
hr: Cijeli cayenne
lt: Visas kajenas
nl: Hele cayennepepers
sv: Hela cayennepeppar

en: Tasmanian Pepperberry, mountain pepper, bush pepper
fr: Poivre de Tasmanie

en: Gray peppers
fr: Poivres gris
hr: Sive paprike
lt: Pilkieji pipirai
nl: Grijze peper

en: Sichuan pepper
ar: فلفل سشوان
ca: Pebre de Sichuan
da: Sichuanpeber
eo: Siĉuan-piproj
et: Sichuani pipar
fa: فلفل سیچوآن
fi: Sichuan pippuri
fr: Poivre du Sichuan, Poivre Sansho, Sansho
gu: ચીરફળ
hr: Sečuanski papar
id: Lada sichuan
is: Sichuanpipar
ja: 花椒, 山椒
jv: Mrica Sichuan
ko: 화자오
ml: സിഷ്വാൻ മുളക്
ms: Lada Sichuan
nb: Sichuanpepper
ne: टिमुर
pl: Pieprz syczuański
ru: Сычуаньский перец
sv: Sichuanpeppar
uk: Сичуанський перець
vt: Tiêu Tứ Xuyên
zh: 花椒, 山椒, 四川花椒